California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) In communications between qualified professional persons, whether employed by a regional center or state developmental center, or not, in the provision of intake, assessment, and services or appropriate referrals. The consent of the person with a developmental disability, or the person’s guardian or conservator, shall be obtained before information or records may be disclosed by regional center or state developmental center personnel to a professional not employed by the regional center or state developmental center, or a program not vendored by a regional center or state developmental center.

(b) When the person with a developmental disability, who has the capacity to give informed consent, designates individuals to whom information or records may be released. This chapter does not compel a physician and surgeon, psychologist, social worker, marriage and family therapist, professional clinical counselor, nurse, attorney, or other professional to reveal information that has been given to the person in confidence by a family member of the person unless a valid release has been executed by that family member.

(c) To the extent necessary for a claim, or for a claim or application to be made on behalf of a person with a developmental disability for aid, insurance, government benefit, or medical assistance to which the person may be entitled.

(d) If the person with a developmental disability is a minor, dependent ward, or conservatee, and the person’s parent, guardian, conservator, limited conservator with access to confidential records, or authorized representative, designates, in writing, persons to whom records or information may be disclosed. This chapter does not compel a physician and surgeon, psychologist, social worker, marriage and family therapist, professional clinical counselor, nurse, attorney, or other professional to reveal information that has been given to the person in confidence by a family member of the person unless a valid release has been executed by that family member.

(e) For research, if the Director of Developmental Services designates, by regulation, rules for the conduct of research and requires the research to be first reviewed by the appropriate institutional review board or boards. These rules shall include, but need not be limited to, the requirement that all researchers shall sign an oath of confidentiality as follows: “ DateAs a condition of doing research concerning persons with developmental disabilities who have received services from ____ (fill in the facility, agency, or person), I, ____, agree to obtain the prior informed consent of persons who have received services to the maximum degree possible as determined by the appropriate institutional review board or boards for protection of human subjects reviewing my research, or the person’s parent, guardian, or conservator, and I further agree not to divulge any information obtained in the course of the research to
 unauthorized persons, and not to publish or otherwise make public any information regarding persons who have received services so those persons who received services are identifiable.

I recognize that the unauthorized release of confidential information may make me subject to a civil action under provisions of the Welfare and Institutions Code. ” Signed(f) To the courts, as necessary to the administration of justice.

(g) To governmental law enforcement agencies as needed for the protection of federal and state elective constitutional officers and their families.

(h) To the Senate Committee on Rules or the Assembly Committee on Rules for the purposes of legislative investigation authorized by the committee.

(i) To the courts and designated parties as part of a regional center report or assessment in compliance with a statutory or regulatory requirement, including, but not limited to, Section 1827.5 of the Probate Code, Sections 1001.22 and 1370.1 of the Penal Code, and Section 6502 of
 this code.

(j) To the attorney for the person who was sterilized or alleges they have been sterilized, or to the attorney of an individual with a developmental disability in any and all proceedings upon presentation of a release of information signed by the person, except that when the person lacks the capacity to give informed consent, the regional center or state developmental center director or designee, upon satisfying themselves of the identity of the attorney, and of the fact that the attorney represents the person, shall release all information and records relating to the person. This article does not compel a physician and surgeon, psychologist, social worker, marriage and family therapist, professional clinical counselor, nurse, attorney, or other professional to reveal information that has been given to the person in confidence by a family member of the person unless a valid release has been executed by that family member.

(k) Upon written consent by a person with a developmental disability previously or presently receiving services from a regional center or state developmental center, the director of the regional center or state developmental center, or the director’s designee, may release any information, except information that has been given in confidence by members of the family of the person with a developmental disability, requested by a probation officer charged with the evaluation of the person after the person’s conviction of a crime if the regional center or state developmental center director or designee determines that the information is relevant to the evaluation. The consent shall only be operative until sentence is passed on the crime for which the person was convicted. The confidential information released pursuant to this subdivision shall be transmitted to the court separately from the probation report and shall not be placed in the probation report. The confidential information shall remain confidential except for purposes of sentencing. After sentencing, the confidential information shall be sealed.

(l) Between persons who are trained and qualified to serve on multidisciplinary personnel teams, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 18951. The
 information and records sought to be disclosed shall be relevant to the prevention, identification, management, or treatment of an abused child and the child’s parents pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 18950) of Part 6 of Division 9.

(m) When a person with a developmental disability dies from any cause, natural or otherwise, while hospitalized in a state developmental center, the State Department of Developmental Services, the physician and surgeon in charge of the client, or the professional in charge of the facility or the professional’s designee, shall release the patient’s medical record to a medical examiner, forensic pathologist, or coroner, upon request. Except for the purposes included in paragraph (8) of subdivision (b) of Section 56.10 of the Civil Code, a medical examiner, forensic pathologist, or coroner shall not disclose any information contained in the medical record obtained pursuant to this subdivision without a court order or authorization pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 56.11 of the Civil Code.

(n) To authorized licensing personnel who are employed by, or who are authorized representatives of, the State Department of Public Health, and who are licensed or registered health professionals, and to authorized legal staff or special investigators who
 are peace officers who are employed by, or who are authorized representatives of, the State Department of Social Services, as necessary to the performance of their duties to inspect, license, and investigate health facilities and community care facilities, and to ensure that the standards of care and services provided in these facilities are adequate and appropriate and to ascertain compliance with the rules and regulations to which the facility is subject. The confidential information shall remain confidential except for purposes of inspection, licensing, or investigation pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, or a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding in relation thereto. The confidential information may be used by the State Department of Public Health or the State Department of Social Services in a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding. The confidential information shall be available
 only to the judge or hearing officer and to the parties to the case. Names that are confidential shall be listed in attachments separate to the general pleadings. The confidential information shall be sealed after the conclusion of the criminal, civil, or administrative hearings, and shall not subsequently be released except in accordance with this subdivision. If the confidential information does not result in a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding, it shall be sealed after the State Department of Public Health or the State Department of Social Services decides that no further action will be taken in the matter of suspected licensing violations. Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, confidential information in the possession of the State Department of Public Health or the State Department of Social Services shall not contain the name of the person with a developmental disability.

(o) To a board that licenses and certifies
 professionals in the fields of mental health and developmental disabilities pursuant to state law, when the Director of Developmental Services has reasonable cause to believe that there has occurred a violation of a law subject to the jurisdiction of a board and the records are relevant to the violation. The information shall be sealed after a decision is reached in the matter of the suspected violation, and shall not subsequently be released except in accordance with this subdivision. Confidential information in the possession of the board shall not contain the name of the person with a developmental disability.

(p) (1) To governmental law enforcement agencies by the director of a regional center or state developmental center, or the director’s designee, when (A) the person with a developmental disability has been reported lost or missing or (B) there is probable cause to believe that a person with a developmental disability has committed, or has been the victim of, murder, manslaughter, mayhem, aggravated mayhem, kidnapping, robbery, carjacking, assault with the intent to commit a felony, arson, extortion, rape, forcible sodomy, forcible oral copulation, assault or battery, or unlawful possession of a weapon, as provided in any provision listed in Section 16590 of the Penal Code.

(2) This subdivision shall be limited solely to information directly relating to the factual circumstances of the commission of the enumerated offenses and shall not include information relating to the mental state of the
 patient or the circumstances of the patient’s treatment unless relevant to the crime involved.

(3) This subdivision is not an exception to, and does not in any other way affect, the provisions of Article 7 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code, or Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 15600) and Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 15750) of Part 3 of Division 9.

(q) To the Division of Juvenile Facilities and Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or any component thereof, as necessary to the administration of justice.

(r) To an agency mandated to investigate a report of abuse filed pursuant to either Section 11164 of the Penal Code
 or Section 15630 of this code for the purposes of either a mandated or voluntary report or when those agencies request information in the course of conducting their investigation.

(s) When a person with a developmental disability, or the parent, guardian, or conservator of a person with a developmental disability who lacks capacity to consent, fails to grant or deny a request by a regional center or state developmental center to release information or records relating to the person with a developmental disability within a reasonable period of time, the director of the regional or developmental center, or the director’s designee, may release information or records on behalf of that person if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) Release of the information or records is deemed necessary to protect the person’s health, safety, or welfare.

(2) The person, or the person’s parent, guardian, or conservator, has been advised annually in writing of the policy of the regional center or state developmental center for release of confidential client information or records when the person with developmental disabilities, or the person’s parent, guardian, or conservator, fails to respond to a request for release of the information or records within a reasonable period of time. A statement of policy contained in the
 client’s individual program plan shall be deemed to comply with the notice requirement of this paragraph.

(t) (1) When an employee is served with a notice of adverse action, as defined in Section 19570 of the Government Code, the following information and records may be released:

(A) All information and records that the appointing authority relied upon in issuing the notice of adverse action.

(B) All other information and records that are relevant to the adverse action, or that would constitute relevant evidence as defined in Section 210 of the Evidence Code.

(C) The information described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) may be released only if both of the following conditions are met:

(i) The appointing authority has provided written notice to the consumer and the consumer’s legal representative or, if the consumer has no legal representative or if the legal representative is a state agency, to the clients’ rights advocate, and the consumer, the consumer’s legal representative, or the clients’ rights advocate has not objected in writing to the appointing authority within five business days of receipt of the notice, or the appointing authority, upon review of the objection has determined that the circumstances on which the adverse action is based are egregious or threaten the health, safety, or life of the consumer or other consumers and without the information the adverse action could not be taken.

(ii) The appointing authority, the person against whom the adverse action has been taken, and the person’s representative, if any, have entered into a stipulation that
 does all of the following:

(I) Prohibits the parties from disclosing or using the information or records for any purpose other than the proceedings for which the information or records were requested or provided.

(II) Requires the employee and the employee’s legal representative to return to the appointing authority all records provided to them under this subdivision, including, but not limited to, all records and documents or copies thereof that are no longer in the possession of the employee or the employee’s legal representative because they were from a source containing confidential information protected by this section, and all copies of those records and documents, within 10 days of the date that the adverse action becomes final, except for the actual records and documents submitted to the administrative tribunal as a component of an appeal from the adverse action.

(III) Requires the parties to submit the stipulation to the administrative tribunal with jurisdiction over the adverse action at the earliest possible opportunity.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, the State Personnel Board may issue, before an appeal from adverse action being filed with it, a protective order, upon application by the appointing authority, for the limited purpose of prohibiting the parties from disclosing or using information or records for any purpose other than the proceeding for which the information or records were requested or provided, and to require the employee or the employee’s legal representative to return to the appointing authority all records provided to them under this subdivision, including, but not limited to, all records and documents from any source containing confidential information protected by this section, and all copies of those records and documents, within 10 days of the date that the adverse action becomes final, except for the actual records and documents that are no longer in the possession of the employee or the employee’s legal representatives because they were submitted to the administrative tribunal as a component of an appeal from the adverse action.

(3) Individual identifiers, including, but not limited to, names, social security numbers, and hospital numbers, that are not necessary for the prosecution or defense of the adverse action, shall not be disclosed.

(4) All records, documents, or other materials containing confidential information protected by this section that have been submitted or otherwise disclosed to the administrative agency or other person as a component of an appeal from an adverse action shall, upon proper motion by the appointing authority to the administrative tribunal, be placed under administrative seal and shall not, thereafter, be subject to disclosure to any person or entity except upon the issuance of an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, an adverse action becomes final when the employee
 fails to answer within the time specified in Section 19575 of the Government Code, or, after filing an answer, withdraws the appeal, or, upon exhaustion of the administrative appeal or of the judicial review remedies as otherwise provided by law.

(u) To the person appointed as the developmental services decisionmaker for a minor, dependent, or ward pursuant to Section 319, 361, or 726.

(v) To a protection and advocacy agency established pursuant to Section 4901, to the extent that the information is incorporated within any of the following:

(1) An unredacted facility evaluation report form or an unredacted complaint investigation report form of the State Department of Social Services. This information shall remain confidential and subject to the confidentiality requirements of subdivision (f) of Section 4903.

(2) An unredacted citation report, unredacted licensing report, unredacted survey report, unredacted plan of correction, or unredacted statement of deficiency of the State Department of Public Health, prepared by authorized licensing personnel or authorized representatives described in subdivision (n). This information shall remain confidential and subject to the confidentiality requirements of subdivision (f) of Section 4903.

(w) To the regional center clients’ rights advocate who provides service pursuant to Section 4433, unless the consumer objects on the consumer’s own behalf, for the purpose of providing authorized clients’ rights advocacy services pursuant to Section 4418.25 or 4418.7, subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 4648, Sections 4684.80 to 4684.87, inclusive, or Section 4698 or 7502.5 of this code, or Section 1267.75 or 1531.15 of the Health and Safety Code.

(x) For purposes of this section, a reference to a “medical examiner, forensic pathologist, or coroner” means a coroner or deputy coroner, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 830.35 of the Penal Code, or a licensed physician who currently performs official autopsies on behalf of a county coroner’s office or a medical examiner’s office, whether as a government employee or under contract to that office.

(y) To authorized personnel who are employed by the Employment Development Department as necessary to enable the Employment Development Department to provide the information required to be disclosed to the State Department of Developmental Services pursuant to subdivision (ak) of Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code. The Employment Development Department shall maintain the confidentiality of information provided to it by the State Department of Developmental Services to the same extent as if the Employment Development Department had acquired the information directly.

(z) To authorized personnel who are employed by the State Department of Social Services as necessary to enable the department to provide the information required to be disclosed to the State Department of Developmental Services pursuant to Section 10850.6. The State Department of Social Services shall maintain
 the confidentiality of any information provided to it by the State Department of Developmental Services to the same extent as if the State Department of Social Services had directly acquired that information.

(aa) To authorized personnel who are employed by the California Victim Compensation Board for the purposes of verifying the identity and eligibility of individuals claiming compensation pursuant to the Forced or Involuntary Sterilization Compensation Program described in Chapter 1.6 (commencing with Section 24210) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code. The California Victim Compensation Board shall maintain the confidentiality of any information or records received from the department in accordance with Part 160 (commencing with Section 160.101) and Part 164 (commencing with Section 164.102) of Subchapter C of Subtitle A of Title 45 of the Code of
 Federal Regulations and this section. Public disclosure of aggregated claimant information or the annual report required under subdivision (b) of Section 24211 of the Health and Safety Code is not a violation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 77, Sec. 32.   (AB 137)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4514.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 4514, information and records shall be disclosed to the protection and advocacy agency designated by the Governor in this state to fulfill the requirements and assurances of the federal Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000, contained in Chapter 144 (commencing with Section 15001) of Title 42 of the United States Code, for the protection and advocacy of the rights of persons with developmental disabilities, as defined in Section 15002(8) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(b) Access to information and records to which subdivision (a) applies shall be in accord with Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4900).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 878, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4514.5.

Upon request of a family member of a resident of a state hospital, community care facility, or health facility, or other person designated by the resident, the facility shall give such family member or the designee notification of the resident’s presence in the facility, the transfer, the diagnosis, the prognosis, the medications prescribed, the side effects of medications prescribed, if any, the progress of the resident, and the serious illness of the resident, if, after notification of the resident that such information is requested, the resident authorizes such disclosure. If, when initially informed of the request for notification, the resident is unable
 to authorize the release of such information, notation of the attempt shall be made into the resident’s treatment record, and daily efforts shall be made to secure the resident’s consent or refusal of such authorization. However, if a request for information is made by the spouse, parent, child, or sibling of the resident and the resident is unable to authorize the release of such information, such requester shall be given notification of the resident’s presence in the facility, except to the extent prohibited by federal law. Upon request of a family member of a resident or the designee, the facility shall notify such family member or designee of the release or death of the resident. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require photocopying of the resident’s medical records in order to satisfy its provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1141, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4515.

Signed consent forms by a person with a developmental disability or, where appropriate, the parent, guardian, or conservator, for release of any information to which such person consents under the provision of Sections 11878 or 11879 of the Health and Safety Code, or subdivision (a) or (d) of Section 4514 shall be obtained for each separate use with the use specified, the information to be released, the name of the agency or individual to whom information will be released indicated on the form and the name of the responsible individual who has authorization to release information specified. Any use of this form shall be noted in the file of the person with
 developmental disabilities. Persons who sign consent forms shall be given a copy of the consent forms signed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1141, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4516.

When any disclosure of information or records is made as authorized by the provisions of subdivision (a), (d), or (q) of Section 4514 or Section 4514.5, the physician in charge of the person with a developmental disability or the professional in charge of the facility shall promptly cause to be entered into the person’s medical record the date and circumstances under which such disclosure was made, the names and relationships to the person, if any, of individuals or agencies to whom such disclosure was made, and the specific information disclosed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1141, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

4517.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the compilation and publication of statistical data for use by government or researchers and standards set by the Director of Developmental Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1141, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

4518.

Any person may bring an action against an individual who has willfully and knowingly released confidential information or records concerning him or her in violation of the provisions of this chapter, or of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11860) of Part 3 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code, for the greater of the following amounts:

(1) Five hundred dollars ($500).

(2) Three times the amount of actual damages, if any, sustained by the plaintiff.

Any person may, in accordance
 with the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, bring an action to enjoin the release of confidential information or records in violation of the provisions of this chapter, and may in the same action seek damages as provided in this section.

It is not a prerequisite to an action under this section that the plaintiff suffer or be threatened with actual damages.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1141, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

4519.

(a) The department shall not expend funds, and a regional center shall not expend funds allocated to it by the department, for the purchase of any service outside the state unless the Director of Developmental Services or the director’s designee has received, reviewed, and approved a plan for out-of-state service in the consumer’s individual program plan developed pursuant to Sections 4646 to 4648, inclusive. Prior to submitting a request for out-of-state services, the regional center shall conduct a comprehensive assessment and convene an individual program plan meeting to determine the services and supports needed for the consumer to receive services in California and shall request assistance from the department’s statewide specialized resource service in identifying options to serve the consumer in
 California. The request shall include details regarding all options considered and an explanation of why these options cannot meet the consumer’s needs. The department shall authorize for no more than six months the purchase of out-of-state services when the director determines the proposed service or an appropriate alternative, as determined by the director, is not available from resources and facilities within the state. Any extension beyond six months shall be based on a new and complete comprehensive assessment of the consumer’s needs, review of available options, and determination that the consumer’s needs cannot be met in California. An extension shall not exceed six months. For the purposes of this section, the department shall be considered a service agency under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 4700).

(b) Funds shall not be expended for the cost of interstate travel or transportation by regional center staff in connection with the
 purchase of any service outside the state unless authorized by the director or the director’s designee.

(c) If a regional center places a consumer out of state pursuant to subdivision (a), it shall prepare a report for inclusion in the consumer’s individual program plan. This report shall summarize the regional center’s efforts to locate, develop, or adapt an appropriate program for the consumer within the state. This report shall be reviewed and updated every three months, and a copy shall be sent to the director. Each comprehensive assessment and report shall include identification of the services and supports needed and the timeline for identifying or developing those services needed to transition the consumer back to California.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), the State Department of Developmental Services or a regional center may expend funds allocated to
 it for the purchase of services for residents of this state and administrative costs incurred in providing services in the border areas of a state adjacent to California when the purchase is approved by the regional center director.

(e) Each regional center shall submit to the department by December 31, 2012, a transition plan for all consumers residing out of state as of June 30, 2012, for whom the regional center is purchasing services.

(f) This section shall become operative January 1, 2022.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 21) and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 22.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4519.1.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to modernize the department’s financial and case management information technology systems for use by regional centers through the development and implementation of the Life Outcomes Improvement System (LOIS). LOIS shall serve as the system used by all regional centers to improve the user experience, promote access, and manage eligibility and services for individuals and families who are applying for or receiving regional center services.

(2) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(A) LOIS is intended to provide a more consistent statewide experience for individuals and families, regional
 centers, and service providers.

(B) LOIS is intended to enable individuals, families, and service providers to access and update their own information.

(C) LOIS is intended to simplify the complexity of information technology support needs for the delivery of developmental services and eliminate costly duplications and redundancies and data reconciliation and transfers.

(D) LOIS is intended to enable more robust, timely, complete, and consistent data collection, reporting, and analysis capabilities, enabling better management of regional centers, services to individuals and families, and improved information for oversight, monitoring, and policymaking.

(b) For purposes of this section, LOIS constitutes an “enterprise system,” as defined in Section
 7922.700 of the Government Code.

(c) Beginning July 1, 2026, regional centers shall do all of the following to prepare for and assist the transition from their existing information technology systems to LOIS:

(1) Notify the department of any plans to permit or actions permitting third-party applications or information technology systems to access data of any of the following:

(A) Individuals applying for or receiving regional center services, and their families.

(B) Service provider information.

(C) Financial information.

(D) Regional center operations.

(2) Notify the department of any plans to use any new information technology systems that will do either of the following:

(A) Collect, retain, or transmit information described in paragraph (1).

(B) Replicate, enhance, or replace the existing functionality of existing systems.

(3) Prohibit both the transitioning of, or planning the transition of, any existing case management system, such as SANDIS, Virtual Chart, SmartChart, KEA, Atlas, and Atticus, to solutions other than LOIS, without prior written approval from the department.

(4) Prioritize data cleanup and other transitional activities necessary to prepare for the implementation of LOIS, as directed by the department.

(d) Upon readiness of LOIS for implementation, each regional center shall discontinue the use of all other case management and financial technology systems, following instructions from the department. The transition to implementation of LOIS shall be designed and implemented to minimize disruptions for individuals and families and regional center operations.

(e) Beginning July 1, 2026, and until completion of planning for LOIS, the department shall submit quarterly written updates to both the relevant budget subcommittees and policy committees of each house of the Legislature, as well as the Legislative Analyst’s Office, on the planning for LOIS. The written updates shall include a plain language description of progress towards the implementation of LOIS that includes, but is not limited to, all the following:

(1) The most recent estimated cost and schedule of LOIS.
 If, at the time of an update, the department has not completed the Stage 2 Alternatives Analysis of the Project Approval Lifecycle (PAL) process, the department shall provide the “rough order of magnitude” estimate included in the Stage 1 Business Analysis of the PAL process.

(2) An accounting of LOIS planning expenditures to date and the remaining balances of appropriated funds at the time of the quarterly submission.

(3) Status updates on any requests for federal funding.

(4) A copy of the governance and change management plans for LOIS.

(5) The involvement in LOIS of individuals and families, regional centers, service providers, and advocacy organizations.

(f) The department shall
 provide the Legislature with a copy of the Post Implementation Evaluation Report for LOIS, when available, which shall include the details of both stakeholder involvement and regular reporting to the Legislature on how the goals specified in subdivision (a) are being met as the project moves into maintenance and operations.

(g) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and make specific the provisions of this section by means of written directives or similar instructions consistent with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 19.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4519.2.

(a) The department shall identify key indicators to track the regional center system’s delivery of services. These indicators shall include both local and statewide measures and shall include a recommendation for analysis and follow up of any concerning trends, as well as a plan for reporting of best practices for use statewide. The department, with stakeholder input, shall also identify
 recommendations for measuring outcomes and improving outcomes for consumers. Goals for system improvement include enhancement of customer services for consumers and their families, facilitation of enhanced communication between regional centers and the state, and identification and dissemination of best practices for developmental services providers. The department shall report these recommended indicators, best practices, and recommendations for analysis to the Legislature no later than January 10, 2021.

(b) (1) Each regional center shall post the following information on its internet website in a format determined by the department no later than April 1, 2020, and shall update the information no less frequently than every six months until the department determines that statewide compliance with the federal Home and Community-Based Services (HCBS) Final Rule has been met, or January 1, 2025, whichever is earlier:

(A) The number of providers identified as needing assessment for HCBS compliance, broken down by provider type, as defined by the department.

(B) The number of providers within each provider type that have been inspected or reviewed for HCBS compliance.

(C) The number of providers within each provider type that have been determined to be HCBS compliant.

(D) The number of providers within each provider type that have been determined not to be HCBS compliant and the reason for lack of compliance.

(E) The number of providers, broken down by provider type, that have been identified as presumed to have the qualities of an institutional setting, as described in Sections 441.301(c)(5)(v) and
 441.710(a)(2)(v) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) The department shall provide this information to the Legislature as statewide data and for each regional center, no later than May 1, 2020, and shall post that summary on its internet website.

(3) Beginning July 1, 2026, the department shall post the information described in paragraph (1) on its internet website, and shall update the information no less frequently than every six months to monitor compliance with the federal Home and Community-Based Services (HCBS) Final Rule. The information may be collected through the statewide provider directory, the Life Outcomes Improvement System, or any other means identified by the department.

(c) (1) The department shall update the Legislature annually, beginning on January 10, 2020, with the number of complaints filed at each regional center pursuant to Section 4731 for the prior fiscal year, and include the following information:

(A) The subject matter of complaints filed.

(B) How complaints were resolved.

(C) The timeframe within which resolutions to those complaints were provided by the regional center.

(D) The number of complaints that were appealed to the department, their resolution, and the timeframe within which a written administrative decision was issued.

(E) Demographic information, as identified by the department, about consumers
 on whose behalf the complaint was filed, including the ethnicity of the consumer.

(2) The update shall include data for the prior two fiscal years, as available.

(3) The department shall also post this data on its internet website.

(4) This subdivision shall become inoperative on February 1, 2027.

(d) The department and each regional center shall include on their internet websites a link to the protection and advocacy agency designated pursuant to Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4900) and the clients’ rights advocate contracted with pursuant to Section 4433. This link shall be posted on the home page of their internet websites, or in another
 standard location determined by the department.

(e) On and after October 1, 2019, the department shall post all new directives that it issues to regional centers on its internet website.
